Missouri, session 2026, HB1609.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 171.021, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 171.021, to read as follows:
171.021. 1. Every school in this state which is supported in whole or in part by public
moneys, during the hours while school is in session, shall display in some prominent place
either upon the outside of the school building or upon a pole erected in the school yard the
flag of the United States of America.
2. Every school in this state which is supported in whole or in part by public moneys
shall ensure that the Pledge of Allegiance to the flag of the United States of America is recited
in at least one scheduled class of every pupil enrolled in that school no less often than once
per school day. Flags for display in individual classrooms may be provided by voluntary
donation by any person. No student shall be required to recite the Pledge of Allegiance.
3. (1) A public school may display any or all of the following flags in such public
school's classrooms:
(a) The flag of the United States;
(b) The official flag of the state of Missouri;
(c) The POW/MIA flag; or
(d) The flag of the public school.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1609 2
(2) Except for the flags listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection, no flag shall be
displayed in public school classrooms.
✔